Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0866.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of
corrections for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the
following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 16.0
Full-time equated classified positions 12,758.0
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,184,138,100
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 0
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,184,138,100
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 5,222,600
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 275,000
Total private revenues 0
Total other state restricted revenues 30,559,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 2,148,080,700
Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 16.0
Full-time equated classified positions 414.0
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 16.0 $ 2,433,800
Administrative hearings officers 4,229,600
Budget and operations administration--FTEs 317.0 46,106,500
Compensatory buyout and union leave bank 100
Corrections officer pensions 33,000,000
County jail reimbursement program 14,564,600
Employee wellness programming--FTEs 9.0 2,593,300
Equipment and special maintenance 1,559,700
Executive direction--FTEs 28.0 5,586,700
Judicial data warehouse user fees 50,600
New custody staff training 12,338,600
Prison industries operations--FTEs 60.0 10,449,400
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


Property management 2,638,000
Prosecutorial and detainer expenses 2,551,000
Worker's compensation 8,584,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 146,686,000
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
DOJ, prison rape elimination act grant 674,700
Special revenue funds:
Correctional industries revolving fund 10,449,400
Correctional industries revolving fund 110 721,600
Jail reimbursement program fund 5,900,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 128,940,300
Sec. 103. OFFENDER SUCCESS ADMINISTRATION
Full-time equated classified positions 330.9
Community corrections comprehensive plans and
services $ 15,198,100
County residential services 13,575,500
Criminal justice reinvestment 1,448,400
Education/skilled trades/career readiness
programs--FTEs 249.9 39,917,800
Enhanced food technology program--FTEs 11.0 1,614,700
Higher education in prison 1,250,000
Offender success community partners 18,925,000
Offender success federal grants 751,000
Offender success programming 15,742,200
Offender success services--FTEs 70.0 16,074,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 124,497,200
Appropriated from:
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


Federal revenues:
DOJ, prisoner reintegration 751,000
Federal education revenues 1,643,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 122,102,400
Sec. 104. FIELD OPERATIONS ADMINISTRATION
Full-time equated classified positions 1,701.5
Field operations--FTEs 1,670.5 $ 233,379,000
Parole board operations--FTEs 31.0 3,999,100
Parole/probation services 940,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 238,318,100
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Community tether program reimbursement 275,000
Reentry center offender reimbursements 10,000
Supervision fees 6,630,500
Supervision fees set-aside 940,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 230,462,600
Sec. 105. CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES ADMINISTRATION
Full-time equated classified positions 678.0
Body-worn cameras--FTEs 8.0 $ 3,848,700
Central records--FTEs 43.0 5,010,200
Contraband prevention 2,750,000
Correctional facilities administration--FTEs 37.0 7,089,300
Housing inmates in federal institutions 511,000
Inmate housing fund 100
Inmate legal services 290,900
Intelligence unit--FTEs 30.0 4,135,000
Leased beds and alternatives to leased beds 100
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


Prison food service--FTEs 324.0 79,029,100
Prison store operations--FTEs 32.0 3,745,300
Transportation--FTEs 204.0 36,578,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 142,988,300
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
DOJ-BOP, federal prisoner reimbursement 411,000
SSA-SSI, incentive payment 272,000
Special revenue funds:
Correctional industries revolving fund 110 901,900
Resident stores 3,745,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 137,658,100
Sec. 106. HEALTH CARE
Full-time equated classified positions 1,475.3
Clinical complexes--FTEs 1,000.8 $ 183,630,400
Health care administration--FTEs 18.0 3,805,400
Healthy Michigan plan administration--FTEs 12.0 1,085,000
Hepatitis C treatment 7,499,100
Interdepartmental grant to health and human
services, eligibility specialists 120,200
Mental health and substance use disorder
treatment services--FTEs 444.5 68,887,100
Prisoner health care services 117,540,700
Vaccination program 691,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 383,259,100
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues and reimbursements 435,300
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


Special revenue funds:
Prisoner health care co-payments 257,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 382,566,600
Sec. 107. CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES
Full-time equated classified positions 8,158.3
Alger Correctional Facility - Munising--FTEs 259.0 $ 30,467,400
Baraga Correctional Facility - Baraga--FTEs 279.8 34,745,500
Bellamy Creek Correctional Facility - Ionia--
FTEs 414.1 50,568,900
Carson City Correctional Facility - Carson
City--FTEs 422.4 51,327,000
Central Michigan Correctional Facility - St.
Louis--FTEs 385.0 49,694,100
Charles E. Egeler Correctional Facility -
Jackson--FTEs 374.6 49,037,100
Chippewa Correctional Facility - Kincheloe--
FTEs 443.6 54,491,800
Cooper Street Correctional Facility - Jackson--
FTEs 254.6 28,887,800
Earnest C. Brooks Correctional Facility -
Muskegon--FTEs 248.2 32,656,000
G. Robert Cotton Correctional Facility -
Jackson--FTEs 375.0 44,009,000
Gus Harrison Correctional Facility - Adrian--
FTEs 285.4 38,717,900
Ionia Correctional Facility - Ionia--FTEs 286.3 37,139,200
Kinross Correctional Facility - Kincheloe--FTEs 222.0 31,341,700
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


Lakeland Correctional Facility - Coldwater--
FTEs 272.4 35,481,800
Macomb Correctional Facility - New Haven--FTEs 313.3 40,133,900
Marquette Branch Prison - Marquette--FTEs 319.7 36,806,400
Muskegon Correctional Facility - Muskegon--FTEs 217.3 29,537,700
Newberry Correctional Facility - Newberry--FTEs 200.1 26,318,600
Oaks Correctional Facility - Eastlake--FTEs 289.4 37,859,900
Parnall Correctional Facility - Jackson--FTEs 262.5 31,413,900
Richard A. Handlon Correctional Facility -
Ionia--FTEs 268.3 34,350,300
Saginaw Correctional Facility - Freeland--FTEs 268.6 35,728,600
Special Alternative Incarceration Program -
Jackson--FTEs 26.2 3,374,700
St. Louis Correctional Facility - St. Louis--
FTEs 302.9 40,697,800
Thumb Correctional Facility - Lapeer--FTEs 295.6 38,474,400
Women's Huron Valley Correctional Complex -
Ypsilanti--FTEs 494.8 62,143,000
Woodland Correctional Facility - Whitmore Lake-
-FTEs 287.2 39,518,800
Northern region administration and support--
FTEs 42.0 4,257,600
Southern region administration and support--
FTEs 48.0 17,115,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,046,296,000
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
DOJ, state criminal assistance program 1,034,800
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


Special revenue funds:
State restricted fees, revenues and
reimbursements 102,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,045,159,100
Sec. 108. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 31,754,900
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 31,754,900
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Correctional industries revolving fund 110 183,000
Supervision fees set-aside 718,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 30,853,100
Sec. 109. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Correctional facilities $ 55,000,000
New custody staff training 12,338,500
Wrap-around services 3,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 70,338,500
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 70,338,500

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is
$2,178,640,500.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state
sources to be paid to local units of government is $122,497,200.00.
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from
which spending to local units of government will occur:
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Community corrections comprehensive plans and
services $ 15,198,100
Community residential services 13,575,500
County jail reimbursement program 14,564,600
Field operations 76,607,900
Leased beds and alternatives to leased beds 100
Prosecutorial and detainer expenses 2,551,000
TOTAL $ 122,497,200
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "Administrative segregation" means confinement for
maintenance of order or discipline to a cell or room apart from
accommodations provided for inmates who are participating in
programs of the facility.
(b) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(c) "Director" means the director of the department.
(d) "DOJ" means the United States Department of Justice.
(e) "DOJ-BOP" means the DOJ Bureau of Prisons.
(f) "Evidence-based" means a decision-making process that
integrates the best available research, clinician expertise, and
client characteristics.
(g) "FTE" means full-time equated position in the classified
service of this state.
(h) "Goal" means the intended or projected result of a
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


comprehensive corrections plan or community corrections program to
reduce repeat offending, criminogenic and high-risk behaviors,
prison commitment rates, the length of stay in a jail, or to
improve the utilization of a jail.
(i) "Jail" means a facility operated by a local unit of
government for the physical detention and correction of individuals
charged with or convicted of criminal offenses.
(j) "OCC" means the office of community corrections.
(k) "Offender success" means that an offender has, with the
support of the community, intervention of the field agent, and
benefit of any participation in programs and treatment, made an
adjustment while at liberty in the community such that the offender
has not been sentenced to or returned to prison for the conviction
of a new crime or the revocation of probation or parole.
(l) "Recidivism" means that term as defined in section 1 of
2017 PA 5, MCL 798.31.
(m) "Serious emotional disturbance" means that term as defined
in section 100d(3) of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL
330.1100d.
(n) "Serious mental illness" means that term as defined in
section 100d(4) of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL
330.1100d.
(o) "SSA" means the United States Social Security
Administration.
(p) "SSA-SSI" means SSA supplemental security income.
(q) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house
appropriations subcommittees on corrections and judiciary, the
senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy
offices, the legislative corrections ombudsman, and the state
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


budget office.
Sec. 204. The department shall use the internet to fulfill the
reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report
readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
required in the current fiscal year on the department's website,
the department shall maintain on its website all reports placed on
the website from previous fiscal years posted by fiscal year in the
same archivable location. The department shall also transmit all
required reports for the current fiscal year to the standard report
recipients and any other required recipients by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
comparable quality.
Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action
against an employee of the department or a prisoner because the
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


employee or prisoner communicates with a member of the legislature
or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law
and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law.
Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare
a report on out-of-state travel expenses not later than January 1.
The report must list all travel by classified and unclassified
employees outside this state in the previous fiscal year that was
funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the
department's budget. The department shall submit the report to the
standard report recipients and to the senate and house
appropriations committees. The report must include all of the
following information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel
occurrence and the proportions funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, and other revenues.
Sec. 208. (1) The department shall maximize utilization of its
in-person state workforce. The department shall prioritize
occupancy utilization of office space for each division within the
department. Employees with job responsibilities that require the
employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall
be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on
timesheets were actually worked.
(2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by
the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization
and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure in-person work is
optimized and occupancy rates are 80% or higher, subject to market
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


conditions.
(3) The department shall adhere to civil service rules and
regulations that state the standard biweekly work period for a
full-time employee in the classified service of this state is the
equivalent of 80 hours of work. The department shall establish
policies and processes to ensure all employees are working their
jobs during agreed upon business hours.
Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the
total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the
close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state
budget office shall submit the report to the standard report
recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house
appropriations committees.
Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,500,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not
available for expenditure until they have been transferred to
another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for local
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available
for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line
item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget
act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 211. The department shall cooperate with the department
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable
website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is
not limited to, all of the following for the department:
(a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
(c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate
with the state budget office to provide an annual report on
estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate
and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 213. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
interfere with the duties of the local health officer.
Sec. 214. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director shall
take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically disadvantaged
business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide
services or supplies, or both. The director shall strongly
encourage firms with which the department contracts to subcontract
with certified geographically disadvantaged business enterprises
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


for services, supplies, or both. As used in this section,
"geographically disadvantaged business enterprises" means that term
as defined in Executive Directive No. 2023-1.
Sec. 215. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on
the number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil
service classification, including a comparison by line item of the
number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds
appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated
positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting
period. The report must be submitted to the standard report
recipients and to the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 216. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the
particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 217. The department shall receive and retain copies of
all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department
shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term
and long-term retention of records. The department may
electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required
by federal and state guidelines.
Sec. 217a. The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all fiscal state recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal
recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026,
are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026,
and any subsequent financial close out period.
Sec. 217b. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget
director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately
reappropriated for the following purposes:
(a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department.
(b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of state police.
(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions of Public Law 117-2 must be followed for state fiscal
recovery funds reallocated and reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and the
house appropriations committees not later than 1 business day after
making any reallocations under subsection (1). The notification
must include the authorized program under which funds were
originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


program, or programs, or purpose, and the department to which the
funds are being reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount
reallocated to each program or purpose.
Sec. 218. Not later than April 1, the department shall report
on each specific policy change made to implement a public act
affecting the department that took effect during the previous
calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act
that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit
the report to the standard report recipients and to the senate and
house appropriations committees, the joint committee on
administrative rules, the senate standing committee on civil
rights, judiciary, and public safety, and the house standing
committee on criminal justice.
Sec. 219. To the extent possible, the department shall not
expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized
work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted.
Sec. 220. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, the department shall submit an
annual report that summarizes all work project accounts. The report
must include all of the following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
Sec. 222. A department or agency that receives an
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


appropriation under this part or part 1 must provide an annual
report to the standard report recipients detailing federal policy
changes that do, or are expected to do, any of the following:
(a) Affect the operations of the department, including
reductions in federal revenue. For federal revenue reductions, the
annual report must detail the impact on the department or agency
and residents of this state, including, but not limited to, all of
the following information:
(i) The amount of additional state revenue required to replace
the lost federal revenue.
(ii) The services the department or agency will have to reduce
or eliminate due to the lost revenue.
(iii) The anticipated fiscal impact on residents of this state.
(b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group
regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the
department or agency.
(c) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the
public.
(d) Increase the department's or agency's costs.
(e) Reduce or eliminate a program that provides services to
residents of this state.
Sec. 223. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $133,039,600.00. From this amount, total
appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department
are estimated at $133,039,600.00. Total appropriations for retiree
health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00.
Sec. 224. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide
to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the
mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the
department.
Sec. 226. The department shall report on any court settlement
that may require further legislative review of state statutory
programs or regulations.
Sec. 227. Not later than November 15, the department shall
disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other third-
party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year.
The report must include the amount of funding received, the
specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding
was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. The report
must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the
chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 228. (1) Not later than 30 days after the enactment of
this act, the house and senate appropriations committees shall
provide to the state budget office a jointly agreed upon list of
legislatively directed spending items funded in part 1. The list
must include all information and documents pertaining to
legislatively directed spending items funded as publicly disclosed
in accordance with sections 364 and 364a of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a.
(2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency
administering the legislatively directed spending items shall post
a report in a publicly accessible location on its website beginning
March 15 of the current fiscal year. The department or agency shall
update the report and shall post an updated report not later than
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


June 15 of the current fiscal year and again not later than
September 15 of the current fiscal year. The department shall
include in the report the most comprehensive information the
department has available at the time of posting for legislatively
directed spending items that are awarded.
(3) As used in this section, "legislatively directed spending
items" means that term as defined in section 364 of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364.
Sec. 229. (1) In addition to any other requirements under this
part, if the department is authorized under this part to expend
funds in addition to those appropriated in part 1, the department
shall, except as otherwise provided under subsection (2), do all of
the following:
(a) Not later than November 1, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees, the
senate and house fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that
details all of the following:
(i) The type of funding received during the previous fiscal
year that was authorized in part 2 of article 2 of 2025 PA 22.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) How much of the funding was spent and for what purpose.
(b) Not later than 60 days after receipt of funds authorized
under this part, provide a report to the chairpersons of the senate
and house appropriations committees, the senate and house fiscal
agencies, and the state budget office that details all of the
following:
(i) The type of funding received.
(ii) When the funding was received.
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) The anticipated or actual amount to be spent and for what
purpose.
(c) Not later than February 15, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees, the
senate and house fiscal agencies, and the state budget office with
an estimate of funding authorized by this part that the department
anticipates it will receive in the subsequent fiscal year,
identifying all of the following:
(i) Each type of funding anticipated.
(ii) The amount of each type of funding anticipated.
(iii) The purpose of each type of funding.
(2) If another reporting requirement under this part would
provide substantially similar information on a substantially
similar time frame as required under subsection (1), subsection (1)
does not apply.

DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT
Sec. 301. For 3 years after a felony offender is released from
the department's jurisdiction, the department shall maintain the
offender's file on the offender tracking information system and
make it publicly accessible in the same manner as the file of the
current offender. The department shall immediately remove the
offender's file from the offender tracking information system upon
determination that the offender was wrongfully convicted and the
offender's file is not otherwise required to be maintained on the
offender tracking information system.
Sec. 302. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall submit a report not later than March 1 on the
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


department's staff retention strategies. The report must include,
but not be limited to, all of the following:
(a) The department's strategies on how to improve employee
engagement, how to improve employee wellness, and how to offer
additional training and professional development for employees,
including metrics the department is using to measure success of
employee wellness programming.
(b) Mechanisms by which the department receives employee
feedback in areas under subdivision (a) and how the department
considers suggestions made by employees.
(c) Steps the department has taken, and future plans and goals
the department has for retention and improving employee wellness.
Sec. 303. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall submit a report not later than March 1 on the
number of employee departures. The report must include all of the
following:
(a) The number of corrections officers that departed from
employment at a state correctional facility in the previous fiscal
year and the number of years they worked for the department.
(b) A chart that shows the normal distribution of employee
departures in the positions described under subdivision (a) based
on years of service. Years of service must be grouped into the
following ranges: 1 to 3 years, 3 to 5 years, 5 to 10 years, 10 to
15 years, 15 to 20 years, and 20 and more years.
(c) A section that shows the distinction between all of the
following:
(i) Recruits who are in training at the academy that depart
employment.
(ii) Recruits who are in training at a facility that depart
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


employment.
(iii) Employees who have been on the job that depart employment.
(d) A summary of the primary reasons for departure for each of
the ranges of years of service described under subdivision (1)(b)
based on the available responses.
Sec. 304. Funds appropriated in part 1 for prosecutorial and
detainer expenses must be used to reimburse counties for housing
and custody of parole violators and offenders being returned by the
department from community placement who are available for return to
institutional status and for prisoners who volunteer for placement
in a county jail.
Sec. 305. The department shall provide fiduciary oversight of
funds received under the local corrections officers training act,
2003 PA 125, MCL 791.531 to 791.546.
Sec. 306. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall issue a report not later than March 1 for all
vendor contracts with a value of $500,000.00 or more that includes
the following:
(a) The original start date and the current expiration date of
each contract.
(b) The number of available option years.
(c) The number, if any, of contract compliance monitoring site
visits completed by the department for each vendor in the previous
fiscal year.
(d) The number and amount of fines in the previous fiscal year
for service-level agreement noncompliance for each vendor broken
down by area of noncompliance.
Sec. 307. (1) The department must ensure that a prisoner
telephone system is maintained. The prisoner telephone system must
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


meet ongoing operational needs of the department while maintaining
the lowest per-minute rate possible. The department must provide
notice to the public and standard report recipients at least 45
days in advance of any changes to telephone rates.
(2) To the extent that department intelligence operations are
funded in part 1 rather than funds received through the telephone
contract, any resulting savings to the state and the telephone
contract must be passed to telephone system users in the negotiated
phone call rate.
Sec. 308. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall provide for the training of all custody staff in
effective and safe ways of handling prisoners with mental illness
and referring prisoners to mental health treatment programs. Mental
health awareness training must be incorporated into the training of
new custody staff.
Sec. 309. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall issue a report for all correctional facilities not
later than January 1 that includes all of the following information
for each facility:
(a) The name, street address, and date of construction.
(b) The current maintenance costs.
(c) Any maintenance planned.
(d) The current utility costs.
(e) The expected future capital improvement costs.
(f) The current unspent balance of any authorized capital
outlay projects, including the original authorized amount.
(g) The expected future useful life.
Sec. 310. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall provide a report on the Michigan state industries
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


program not later than December 1. The report must include, but is
not limited to, all of the following information:
(a) The locations of the programs.
(b) The total number of participants at each location.
(c) A description of job duties and typical inmate schedules,
and the products that are produced.
(d) How the program provides marketable skills that lead to
employable outcomes after release from a department facility.
Sec. 311. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for employee
wellness programming must be used for post-traumatic stress
outreach, treating mental health issues, peer support programs, and
providing mental health programming for all department staff,
including former employees.
(2) Not later than December 15, the department shall submit a
report on programs the department has established, the level of
employee involvement, and expenditures made by the department for
employee wellness programming.
Sec. 312. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for new
custody staff, the department shall work to hire and train new
corrections officers to address attrition of corrections officers
and to decrease overtime costs. The department shall submit
quarterly reports on new employee schools. The reports must include
all of the following information for the immediately preceding
fiscal quarter, and as much of the information as possible for the
current and next fiscal year:
(a) The number of new employee schools that took place and the
location of each.
(b) The number of recruits that started in each employee
school.
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


(c) The number of recruits that graduated from each employee
school and continued employment with the department.
(2) Third quarter reports must outline steps the department
has taken to obtain the highest number of recruits possible for
each new employee school. A report prepared under this subsection
must include, but is not limited to, all of the following
information:
(a) Internal sources of recruitment, including transfers and
promotions.
(b) External sources of recruitment, including advertisements.
(c) Job portals, social networking platforms, placement
agencies, job fairs, campus placements, or professional entities
used for recruitment.
(d) Whether the department's website was used to advertise
vacancies.
Sec. 313. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall submit a quarterly report on the number of
overtime hours worked by all custody staff, by facility. The report
must include, for each facility, the reasons for overtime hours
worked and the average number of overtime hours worked by active
employees.
Sec. 314. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department may establish agreements and exchange offender data with
local, state, and federal agencies, law enforcement, community
service and treatment providers, and research partners in order to
improve offender success, reduce recidivism risk, and enhance
public safety. This data sharing may include, but is not limited
to, efforts to support all of the following:
(a) Providing continuing access to behavioral health, physical
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


health, and medication needs through community-based providers.
(b) Establishing assistance program eligibility and
participation.
(c) Collaborating with community service providers for
continued care and access to services for offenders.
(d) Providing ongoing cognitive and behavioral treatment
programming in the community.
(e) Providing substance abuse testing and referrals for
counseling services and treatment.
(f) Providing vocational skill training, job placement
support, and monitoring employment attainment.
(g) Determining educational attainment and needs.
(h) Establishing accurate offender identification, criminal
histories, and monitoring new criminal activity.
(i) Measuring and evaluating treatment programs and services
in support of evidence-based practices.
Sec. 315. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall submit 3-year and 5-year prison population
projection updates not later than April 1, including explanations
of the methodology and assumptions used in developing the
projection updates.
Sec. 316. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall provide an annual statistical report for the
preceding calendar year on the department's website not later than
June 30. The statistical report must include, but not be limited
to, the types of information as provided in the 2022 statistical
report.
Sec. 317. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall report the reincarceration recidivism rates of
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


offenders based on available data.
Sec. 318. (1) The department shall administer a county jail
reimbursement program from the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
purpose of reimbursing counties for housing in jails certain felons
who otherwise would have been sentenced to prison.
(2) The county jail reimbursement program must be used to
reimburse counties for convicted felons in the custody of the
sheriff if the conviction was for a crime committed on or after
January 1, 1999 and 1 of the following applies:
(a) The felon's sentencing guidelines recommended range upper
limit is more than 18 months, the felon's sentencing guidelines
recommended range lower limit is 12 months or less, the felon's
prior record variable score is 35 or more points, and the felon's
sentence is not for commission of a crime in crime class G or crime
class H or a nonperson crime in crime class F under chapter XVII of
the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 777.1 to 777.69.
(b) The felon's minimum sentencing guidelines range minimum is
more than 12 months under the sentencing guidelines described in
subdivision (a).
(c) The felon was sentenced to jail for a felony committed
while the felon was on parole and under the jurisdiction of the
parole board and for which the sentencing guidelines recommended
range for the minimum sentence has an upper limit of more than 18
months.
(3) State reimbursement under this section must be $70.00 per
diem per diverted offender for offenders with a presumptive prison
guideline score, $60.00 per diem per diverted offender for
offenders with a straddle cell guideline for a group 1 crime, and
$45.00 per diem per diverted offender for offenders with a straddle
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


cell guideline for a group 2 crime. Reimbursements must be paid for
sentences up to a 1-year total.
(4) County jail reimbursement program expenditures must not
exceed the amount appropriated in part 1 for the county jail
reimbursement program. Payments to counties under the county jail
reimbursement program must be made in the order in which properly
documented requests for reimbursements are received. A request is
properly documented if it meets departmental requirements for
documentation. Not later than October 15, the department shall
distribute the documentation requirements to all counties.
(5) Any county that receives funding under this section for
the purpose of housing in jails certain felons who otherwise would
have been sentenced to prison shall, as a condition of receiving
the funding, report not later than September 30 an annual average
jail capacity and annual average jail occupancy for the previous
fiscal year.
(6) Not later than February 1, the department shall report all
of the following information:
(a) The number of inmates sentenced to the custody of the
sheriff and eligible for the county jail reimbursement program.
(b) The total amount paid to counties under the county jail
reimbursement program.
(c) The total number of days inmates were in the custody of
the sheriff and eligible for the county jail reimbursement program.
(d) The number of inmates sentenced to the custody of the
sheriff under each of the 3 categories: presumptive prison, group 1
crime, and group 2 crime in subsection (3).
(e) The total amount paid to counties under each of the 3
categories: presumptive prison, group 1 crime, and group 2 crime in
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


subsection (3).
(f) The total number of days inmates were in the custody of
the sheriff under each of the 3 categories: presumptive prison,
group 1 crime, and group 2 crime in subsection (3).
(g) The estimated cost of housing inmates sentenced to the
custody of the sheriff and eligible for the county jail
reimbursement program as inmates of a state prison.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) "Group 1 crime" means a crime in 1 or more of the
following offense categories: arson, assault, assaultive other,
burglary, criminal sexual conduct, homicide or resulting in death,
other sex offenses, robbery, and weapon possession as determined by
the department based on specific crimes for which counties received
reimbursement under the county jail reimbursement program in fiscal
year 2007 and fiscal year 2008, and listed in the county jail
reimbursement program document titled "FY 2007 and FY 2008 Group
One Crimes Reimbursed", dated March 31, 2009.
(b) "Group 2 crime" means a crime that is not a group 1 crime,
including larceny, fraud, forgery, embezzlement, motor vehicle
offenses, malicious destruction of property, controlled substance
offense, felony drunk driving, and other nonassaultive offenses.
(c) "In the custody of the sheriff" means that the convicted
felon has been sentenced to the county jail and either is housed in
a county jail, is in custody but is being housed at a hospital or
medical facility for a medical or mental health purpose, or has
been released from jail and is being monitored through the use of
the sheriff's electronic monitoring system.
Sec. 319. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall provide all of the following information on the
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


offender population in a monthly report:
(a) Prison population by facility and security level,
including the population of prisoners under the department's
jurisdiction housed in county jails.
(b) Net operating capacity according to the most recent
certification report.
(c) Electronic monitoring populations.
(d) Parole populations.
(e) Probation populations, with identification of the number
of offenders in special alternative incarceration.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department
shall provide all of the following information on the offender
population in a quarterly report:
(a) The number of closed housing units and beds in those
units, including the security level of closed beds.
(b) The number of prisoners serving life sentences.
(c) The number of prisoners classified as past their earliest
release date.
(d) The number of prisoner intakes during the previous
quarter.
(e) The number of prisoner exits, including paroles, maximum
discharges, and other exits during the previous quarter.
(3) If the department knows it will not meet the reporting
requirements under this section, the department shall immediately
issue a report that states that fact and that lists the reasons for
not meeting the reporting requirements.
Sec. 320. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on
all of the following:
(a) A detailed accounting of all correction officer positions
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


at each correctional facility, including positions that are filled
and positions that are vacant by facility.
(b) A detailed accounting of all vacant positions that are
health care related.
Sec. 321. The department may charge fees and collect revenues
in excess of appropriations in part 1 not to exceed the cost of
offender services and programming, employee meals, parolee loans,
academic/vocational services, custody escorts, compassionate
visits, union steward activities, and public works programs and
services provided to local units of government or private nonprofit
organizations. The revenues and fees collected are appropriated for
all expenses associated with these services and activities.
Sec. 322. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for corrections
officer pensions must be remitted to the state employees'
retirement system for implementation costs.
(2) The funds appropriated in part 1 for corrections officer
pensions that are remitted to the state employees' retirement
system must be used to pay for costs associated with retirement
benefit changes provided to employees in the department that are
eligible.
(3) This section applies only if House Bill No. 4665, House
Bill No. 4666, and House Bill No. 4667 of the 102nd Legislature are
enacted into law.

OFFENDER SUCCESS ADMINISTRATION
Sec. 401. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall provide a report not later than March 1 on
offender success expenditures, allocations, and performance. The
report must include, but not be limited to, details on prior-year
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


expenditures, including amounts spent on each project funded,
itemized by service provided and service provider. Reported
performance factors must be reported by region and must include,
but not be limited to, all of the following:
(a) The number of individuals who received transitional
housing services.
(b) The average length of stay in transitional housing.
(c) The number of individuals who received a referral for
economic stability assistance and the number of referred
individuals who secured employment or enrolled in
education/training to increase economic stability.
(d) The number of referred individuals who maintained
employment for 12 months or more.
(e) The total amount of leveraged services secured by the
contractor.
(2) As used in this section, "leveraged services" means
services that benefit clients that are not directly paid for by the
department, such as educational scholarships or grants, workforce
training grants, or housing choice vouchers.
(3) The department may accept cash or in-kind donations to
supplement funds for prison education training, supplies, and
materials necessary to complete the academic and jobs skills
related programs. All funds received are appropriated and may be
expended by the department. Any unexpended or unencumbered
donations at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse to the
general fund but shall be carried forward to the subsequent fiscal
year.
Sec. 402. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for offender
success services, the department, when reasonably possible, shall
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


strive to do the following:
(a) Develop workforce and training opportunities in
consultation with employers and state and local workforce agencies.
(b) Assist individuals leaving prison with securing employment
or training prior to or following release, or both.
(c) Work with faith-based and secular organizations to provide
reentry supports and voluntary programming opportunities that have
been demonstrated to reduce prison violence and recidivism.
(d) Provide information on accessing mental health care
following release and, if appropriate, coordinate referral to
community mental health services.
(e) Ensure that inmates have potential employer matches in the
communities to which the inmates will return prior to each inmate's
initial parole hearing.
Sec. 404. Funds awarded for community residential services in
part 1 must provide for all of the following:
(a) An initial client assessment reimbursement of $200.00.
(b) A per diem reimbursement of not more than $70.00.
Sec. 405. Allowable uses of community corrections
comprehensive plans and services funds must include reimbursing
counties for transportation, treatment costs, and housing drunk
drivers during a period of assessment for treatment and case
planning, in accordance with an approved comprehensive plan.
Reimbursements for housing during the assessment process must be at
the rate of $43.50 per day per offender, up to a maximum of 5 days
per offender.
Sec. 406. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall submit the following information for each county
and counties consolidated for community corrections comprehensive
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


plans:
(a) Approved technical assistance grants and community
corrections comprehensive plans including each program and level of
funding, the utilization level of each program, and profile
information of enrolled offenders.
(b) If federal funds are made available, the number of
participants funded, the number served, the number successfully
completing the program, and a summary of the program activity.
(c) Status of the community corrections information system and
the jail population information system.
(d) Data on residential services, including participant data,
participant sentencing guideline scores, program expenditures,
average length of stay, and bed utilization data.
(e) Offender disposition data by sentencing guideline range,
by disposition type, by prior record variable score, by number and
percent statewide and by county, current year, and comparisons to
the previous 3 years.
(f) Data on the use of funding made available under the drunk
driver jail reduction and community treatment program.
(2) The report required under subsection (1) must include the
total funding allocated, program expenditures, required program
data, and year-to-date totals.
Sec. 407. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall establish and maintain policies and procedures
that assist prisoners with obtaining a birth certificate, duplicate
Social Security card, if eligible, DD Form 214 or other military
documentation, state identification card, and operator's license
before parole or discharge.
Sec. 408. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for higher
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


education in prison must be used by the department in collaboration
with accredited universities or colleges to provide incarcerated
individuals the opportunity to participate in comprehensive
bachelor's degree programs at no cost to the incarcerated
individual. The funds must be used for eligible expenses including
staffing, supplies, and tuition.
(2) Universities and colleges that receive funding under this
section must report not later than April 1 on all of the following,
by correctional facility, for the previous fiscal year:
(a) Expenditure of funds.
(b) Number of participants served.
(c) Enrollments, by race and gender.
(d) Number of participants who completed the program.
Sec. 409. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for enhanced
food technology program, the department shall maintain a program
that provides on-the-job training in prison kitchens that provides
prisoners the opportunity to earn food service training credentials
recognized by the restaurant industry. The department shall use the
funds appropriated in part 1 for enhanced food technology program
to collaborate with the Michigan Restaurant and Lodging Association
and other restaurant industry stakeholders to provide job placement
assistance to individuals on probation or parole.
Sec. 410. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall ensure that any inmate with a diagnosed mental
illness is referred to a local mental health care provider that is
able and willing to treat the inmate upon parole or discharge. Upon
referral, the department shall ensure that the provider is informed
of the inmate's current treatment plan including any medications
that are currently prescribed to the inmate.
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


Sec. 411. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall report not later than March 1 on academic and
vocational programs, including, but not limited to, all of the
following:
(a) The number of instructors and the number of instructor
vacancies, by program and facility.
(b) The number of prisoners enrolled in each program, the
number of prisoners completing each program, the number of
prisoners who do not complete each program, and the number of
prisoners on waiting lists for each program.
(c) The racial demographics of prisoners enrolled in each
program.
(d) The steps the department has undertaken to improve
programs, track records, accommodate transfers and prisoners with
health care needs, and reduce waiting lists.
(e) The number of prisoners paroled without a high school
diploma or a high school equivalency.
(f) The number of prisoners not paroled at their earliest
release date because of a lack of a high school equivalency and the
reason those prisoners have not obtained a high school equivalency.
Sec. 413. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for criminal
justice reinvestment must be used only to fund data collection and
evidence-based programs designed to reduce recidivism among
probationers, parolees, and prisoners.
(2) The department shall report on programs described under
this section not later than March 30. The report must include all
of the following:
(a) The reincarceration recidivism rate of program
participants.
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


(b) The employment rate of participants who complete the
program.
(c) The cost of the program per participant.
Sec. 414. Revenues appropriated and collected for program and
special equipment funds must be considered state restricted revenue.
Funding must be used for prisoner programming, special equipment,
and security projects. Not less than 75% of funding must be used for
prisoner programming. Unexpended funds remaining at the close of the
fiscal year must not lapse to the general fund but must be carried
forward and made available for appropriation in subsequent fiscal
years.
Sec. 415. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall report on the department's plans to eliminate
programming for prisoners. The report must be provided not less
than 30 days before program elimination. As used in this section,
"programming for prisoners" means a department core program or
career and technical education program funded in part 1.

FIELD OPERATIONS ADMINISTRATION
Sec. 501. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall review and revise as necessary policy proposals
that provide alternatives to prison for offenders being sentenced
to prison as a result of technical probation violations and
technical parole violations. To the extent the department has
insufficient policies or resources to affect the continued increase
in prison commitments among these offender populations, from the
funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall explore other
policy options to allow for program alternatives, including
department or OCC-funded programs, local level programs, and
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


programs available through private agencies that may be used as
prison alternatives for these offenders.
(2) Not later than April 1, the department shall provide a
report on the number of all parolees returned to prison and
probationers sentenced to prison for either a technical violation
or new sentence during the previous fiscal year. The report must
include the following information for probationers, for parolees
after their first parole, and for parolees who have been paroled
more than once:
(a) The numbers of parole and probation violators returned to
or sent to prison for a new crime with a comparison of original
versus new offenses by major offense type: assaultive,
nonassaultive, drug, and sex.
(b) The numbers of parole and probation violators returned to
or sent to prison for a technical violation and the type of
violation, including, but not limited to, zero gun tolerance and
substance use disorder violations. For parole technical rule
violators, the report must list violations by type, by length of
time since release from prison, by the most recent violation, and
by the number of violations occurring since release from prison.
(c) The educational history of those offenders, including the
number of offenders who had a high school equivalency or high
school diploma before incarceration in prison, the number of
offenders who received a high school equivalency while in prison,
and the number of offenders who received a vocational certificate
while in prison.
(d) The number of offenders who participated in the reentry
program versus the number of those who did not.
(e) The unduplicated number of offenders who participated in
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


substance use disorder treatment programs, mental health treatment
programs, or both, while in prison, itemized by diagnosis.
Sec. 502. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall issue quarterly reports for the previous 4
quarters detailing outcomes of prisoners who have been reviewed for
parole. The report must include all of the following:
(a) The number of prisoners in each quarter who were reviewed.
(b) The number of prisoners who were granted parole.
(c) The number of prisoners who were denied parole.
(d) The number of parole decisions that were deferred.
(e) The distribution of the total number of prisoners reviewed
during that quarter grouped by whether the prisoner had been
interviewed for the first, second, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, or
more than sixth time.
(f) The number of paroles granted, denied, or deferred for
each of the parole guideline scores of low, average, and high.
(g) The reason for denying or deferring parole.
Sec. 503. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall submit a report not later than March 1 on the
medically frail parole process for the previous fiscal year. The
report must include, but not be limited to, the following:
(a) A de-identified list of incarcerated individuals who were
considered for medically frail parole the previous year, including
the following:
(i) Demographic data, including race or ethnicity, gender, and
age.
(ii) The controlling offense of the individual.
(iii) A categorization of the medical condition that resulted in
the individual being considered for medically frail parole.
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


(iv) If the individual was granted medically frail parole or
not, and if not, the reason why medically frail parole was denied.
(b) The number of individuals who were previously granted
medically frail parole that were returned to prison for a new
offense or technical violation of parole.
(c) The number of individuals who were previously granted
medically frail parole that were discharged from further parole
supervision.

HEALTH CARE
Sec. 601. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide
a report on all of the following:
(a) Physical and mental health care, pharmaceutical services,
and durable medical equipment for prisoners. A report under this
section must detail previous fiscal year expenditures itemized by
vendor, allocations, status of payments from contractors to
vendors, and projected year-end expenditures from accounts. A
report under this section must include a breakdown of all payments
to the integrated care provider and to other providers itemized by
physical health care, mental health care, pharmaceutical services,
and durable medical equipment expenditures.
(b) Pharmaceutical prescribing practices, including a detailed
accounting of expenditures on antipsychotic medications, and any
changes that have been made to the prescription drug formularies.
(c) A status report on efforts to develop measurable data and
outcomes for physical and mental health care within the prisoner
population.
Sec. 602. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall provide prisoners with a brochure that explains
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


the purpose and importance of signing a medical release of
information form. The department shall ensure that all prisoners,
upon any health care treatment funded from appropriations in part
1, are given the opportunity to sign a medical release of
information form designating a family member or other individual to
whom the department shall release records and information regarding
the prisoner upon the request of the prisoner. The prisoner may
elect to withdraw or amend the medical release of information form
at any time.
(2) The department shall ensure that a signed medical release
of information form follows a prisoner upon transfer to another
department facility or to the supervision of a parole officer.
(3) The medical release of information form must be placed
online, on a public website managed by the department.
Sec. 603. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall provide a report not later than April 1 on
prisoner health care utilization in the previous fiscal year, by
facility, that includes all of the following:
(a) The number of inpatient hospital days.
(b) The number of outpatient visits.
(c) The number of emergency room visits.
(d) The number of prisoners receiving off-site inpatient
medical care.
(e) The top 10 most common chronic care conditions.
Sec. 604. Funds appropriated in part 1 for Hepatitis C
treatment must be used only to purchase specialty medication for
Hepatitis C treatment in the prison population. In addition to the
above appropriation, any rebates received from the medications used
must be used only to purchase specialty medication for Hepatitis C
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


treatment. Not later than February 15, the department shall issue a
report for the previous fiscal year that includes all of the
following:
(a) The total amount spent on specialty medication for the
treatment of Hepatitis C.
(b) The number of prisoners who were treated for Hepatitis C.
(c) The amount of any rebates that were received from the
purchase of specialty medication, and what, if any, outstanding
rebates are expected to be received.
(d) The Hepatitis C status of all incoming prisoners and the
number of prisoners who are reinfected while incarcerated and
require retreatment for Hepatitis C.
(e) The number of those treated and released and then
retreated upon reincarceration.
Sec. 605. Not later than March 1, the department shall provide
an annual report on the utilization of Medicaid benefits for
prisoners.
Sec. 606. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall support medication-assisted treatment clinics at
designated correctional facilities that allow the department to
treat prisoners with opioid and alcohol use disorder while
incarcerated. The department shall collaborate with substance use
disorder treatment providers and community-based clinics to provide
postrelease assessment and treatment. Funding must be used by the
department to support costs of staff, including nurses, qualified
mental health professionals, recovery coaches, and corrections
officers, and costs of medication and supplies. Participating
prisoners must be encouraged to receive 1 injection of nonaddictive
medication, if clinically appropriate, before being released from
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


prison into the community.
(2) The department shall submit quarterly reports on the
operation of medication-assisted treatment clinics. A report under
this subsection must include, but not be limited to, all of the
following:
(a) Clinic site locations.
(b) A listing of medications used in medication-assisted
therapies at each clinic site.
(c) The number of prisoners prescribed each medication under
subdivision (b), including if the medication is an oral or
injectable treatment.
(d) Total expenditures on clinic medications, including oral
and injectable medications.
(e) The number of prisoners who received treatment in the
community for a duration of at least 3 months.
Sec. 607. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall submit a report not later than March 1 that
includes for the previous fiscal year the total amount of all
medical co-payments collected by prisoners under section 67a of the
corrections code of 1953, 1953 PA 232, MCL 791.267a.
Sec. 608. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall submit a biannual report, by not later than March
1 and September 1 of each year, that contains a de-identified list
of prisoner deaths that occurred in the previous 6 months within
correctional facilities. This report must include, but not be
limited to, all of the following:
(a) The date of death.
(b) The correctional facility or other location at which the
death occurred.
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


(c) The official cause of death, as documented on the death
certificate.
(d) In cases where the cause of death is determined to be a
drug overdose, the type of drug used, if known.

CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES AND ADMINISTRATION
Sec. 701. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for prison
food service, the department shall report not later than January 15
on the following:
(a) Average per-meal cost for prisoner food service. Per-meal
cost includes all costs directly related to the provision of food
for the prisoner population, including, but not limited to, actual
food costs, total compensation for all food service workers,
including benefits and legacy costs, and inspection and compliance
costs for food service.
(b) Food service-related contracts, including goods or
services to be provided and the vendor.
(c) Major sanitation violations.
(2) The department must ensure that not less than $0.25 of the
per-meal cost consists of products grown and produced in this
state.
Sec. 702. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall provide a report on the cost per prisoner per day
for each security custody level not later than January 15. This
cost must include all actual direct and indirect costs for the
previous fiscal year. To calculate the cost per prisoner per day,
the department shall divide the prisoner-related costs by the total
number of prisoner days for each custody level and correctional
facility. For multilevel facilities, costs that cannot be
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


accurately allocated to each custody level may be included in the
calculation on a per-prisoner basis for each facility. Prisoner-
related costs included in the cost per prisoner per day calculation
must include all expenditures for the following, from all fund
sources:
(a) New custody staff training.
(b) Prison industries operations.
(c) Education/skilled trades/career readiness programs.
(d) Enhanced food technology program.
(e) Higher education in prison.
(f) Offender success programming.
(g) Central records.
(h) Correctional facilities administration.
(i) Housing inmates in federal institutions.
(j) Inmate legal services.
(k) Leased beds and alternatives to leased beds.
(l) Prison food service.
(m) Prison store operations.
(n) Transportation.
(o) Health care.
(p) Correctional facilities.
(q) Northern and southern region administration and support.
Sec. 703. Any local unit of government or private nonprofit
organization that contracts with the department for public works
services is responsible for financing the entire cost of such an
agreement.
Sec. 704. The department shall allow the Michigan Braille
transcribing fund program to operate at designated locations. The
department shall continue to encourage the Michigan Braille
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


transcribing fund program to produce high-quality materials for use
by the visually impaired.
Sec. 705. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall report all of the following regarding critical
incidents by facility:
(a) Within 72 hours of occurrence, any critical incident
occurring at a correctional facility. The report must identify the
facility at which the incident occurred.
(b) Not later than March 1, the number of critical incidents
occurring each month at each facility during the previous calendar
year, categorized by type and severity of each incident.
(2) As used in this section, "critical incident" includes a
prisoner assault on staff that results in a serious physical injury
to staff, an escape or attempted escape, a prisoner disturbance
that causes facility operation concerns, the implementation of a
phase plan or similar significant restriction on activity within a
facility, a drug overdose or suspected overdose that results in
inpatient hospitalization, and an unexpected death of a prisoner.
Sec. 706. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall report not later than March 1 on all of the
following ratios for each correctional facility:
(a) Corrections officers to prisoners.
(b) Shift command staff to line custody staff.
(c) Noncustody institutional staff to prisoners.
Sec. 707. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall focus on providing core programming interventions
to prisoners as early as possible during the prisoner's sentence to
impact the prisoner's behavior while incarcerated, and prioritize
individuals who are past their earliest release date and have not
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


been paroled because of not having received the required
programming. Programming includes, but is not limited to, violence
prevention programming, sexual abuse prevention programming,
substance use treatment programming, and core cognitive
programming. Nothing in this section makes parole denial appealable
in court.
(2) The department shall submit a quarterly report detailing
enrollment in sex abuse prevention programming, violence prevention
programming, substance use treatment programming, and core
cognitive programming. At a minimum, the report must include all of
the following:
(a) The current number of individuals who are required to
complete 1 or more of these types of programming, but have not yet
done so.
(b) The number of individuals who have reached their earliest
release date, but who have not completed required programming.
(c) The number of individuals who have completed 1 or more of
these types of programming during their current term of
incarceration.
(d) A plan of action for addressing any waiting lists or
backlogs for programming that may exist.
Sec. 708. If a pregnant prisoner in a facility funded from
appropriations in part 1 consents to a visitor being present, the
department shall allow that 1 person to be present during the
prisoner's labor and delivery, in addition to a doula being present
if the pregnant prisoner wants to work with a doula. The person
allowed to accompany the prisoner must be an immediate family
member, legal guardian, spouse, or domestic partner. The department
is authorized to deny access to a visitor if the department has a
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


safety concern with that visitor's access. The department is
authorized to conduct a criminal background check on the visitor.
Sec. 709. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall evaluate all prisoners at intake for substance use
disorders, serious developmental disorders, serious mental illness,
and other mental health disorders. Prisoners with serious mental
illness or serious developmental disorders must not be removed from
the general population as a punitive response to behavior caused by
their serious mental illness or serious developmental disorder. A
prisoner with serious mental illness or serious developmental
disorder that is unresponsive to treatment who presents a
persistent high violence risk or engages in severe disruptive
behavior may be placed in secure residential housing programs that
facilitate access to institutional programming and ongoing mental
health services funded from appropriations in part 1. A prisoner
with serious mental illness or serious developmental disorder who
is confined in these specialized housing programs must be evaluated
or monitored by a medical professional at a frequency of not less
than every 12 hours.
Sec. 710. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall submit a quarterly report on the number of
prisoners confined to specialized housing units or cells. The
report must include, but is not limited to, the number of
cumulative days each prisoner was confined to the following
locations by correctional facility, race, security classification,
security level, and earliest release date (ERD):
(a) Administrative segregation.
(b) Temporary segregation.
(c) Punitive segregation.
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


(d) In-patient mental health, broken down by program.
(e) Close observation.
(f) Adaptive skills residential program.
(g) Protective custody.
(2) The department shall report the number of prisoners
assigned to a special housing unit or cell listed under subsection
(1)(a) to (g) who, at any time during the current or a prior prison
term, were diagnosed with serious mental illness or have a
developmental disorder.
(3) The report required in subsection (1) must include a chart
listing the number of prisoners housed in administrative
segregation for each of the following time periods:
(a) A continuous period exceeding 3 months but less than 6
months.
(b) A continuous period exceeding 6 months but less than 12
months.
(c) A continuous period exceeding 12 months or longer.
(4) For any prisoner housed in administrative segregation for
12 months or longer, an explanation of the circumstances
surrounding the prisoner's placement in administrative segregation.
Sec. 711. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall do all of the following:
(a) Ensure that any inmate care and control staff in contact
with prisoners less than 18 years of age are adequately trained
with regard to the developmental and mental health needs of
prisoners less than 18 years of age. Not later than April 1, the
department shall report on the training curriculum used and the
number and types of staff receiving annual training under that
curriculum.
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


(b) Provide appropriate placement for prisoners less than 18
years of age who have serious mental illness, serious emotional
disturbance, or a serious developmental disorder and need to be
housed separately from the general population. Prisoners less than
18 years of age who have serious mental illness, serious emotional
disturbance, or a serious developmental disorder must not be
removed from an existing placement as a punitive response to
behavior caused by their serious mental illness, serious emotional
disturbance, or a serious developmental disorder. A prisoner who is
less than 18 years of age with serious mental illness or a serious
developmental disorder that is unresponsive to treatment who
presents a persistent high violence risk or engages in severe
disruptive behavior may be placed in secure residential housing
programs that facilitate access to institutional programming and
ongoing mental health services. A prisoner less than 18 years of
age with serious mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or
a serious developmental disorder who is confined in these
specialized housing programs must be evaluated or monitored by a
medical professional at a frequency of not less than every 12
hours.
(c) Implement a specialized offender success program that
recognizes the needs of prisoners less than 18 years of age for
supervised offender success.
Sec. 712. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall submit quarterly reports on the number of youth in
prison. The report must include, but not be limited to, all of the
following information:
(a) The total number of inmates less than 18 years of age who
are not on Holmes youthful trainee act status.
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


(b) The total number of inmates less than 18 years of age who
are on Holmes youthful trainee act status.
(c) The total number of inmates between the ages of 18 and 23
who are on Holmes youthful trainee act status.
Sec. 713. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department must submit a report on the number of prisoners who lost
visiting privileges. The report required under this section must be
submitted not later than November 15 and include data for the
previous fiscal year. The report must include all of the following
information:
(a) The number of prisoners who lost visiting privileges by
race and by violation type.
(b) The number of prisoners who applied to have visiting
privileges restored.
(c) The number of prisoners who had visiting privileges
restored.
(d) The number of prisoners who had visiting restrictions
extended.
Sec. 714. Funds appropriated in part 1 for intelligence unit
must be used by the department to maintain an intelligence unit to
conduct investigatory and intelligence operations for the
department. Intelligence operations must include, but not be
limited to, intelligence operations for prisoner phone services.
Sec. 715. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department must submit a report on the department's plans to close,
consolidate, or relocate any correctional facility in the state,
upon the plan's approval. The report must include the projected
savings to the state from closure, consolidation, or relocation of
the facility and must include a projection of the potential impact
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


on staff positions.
(2) After a prison closure, consolidation, or relocation, the
department must submit a report on the actual savings achieved by
the department and the impact on staff positions. Savings amounts
and impact on staff positions must be itemized by facility. The
report required under this subsection must be submitted 6 months
after the prison closure, consolidation, or relocation.
Sec. 716. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall consult with the legislature and other appropriate
state agencies to develop a framework to provide investment in
communities that have formerly operational state correctional
facilities that have been closed. This framework must include plans
to ensure that vacant state correctional facilities do not become a
nuisance or danger to the community.
Sec. 717. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall make an information packet for the families of
incoming prisoners available on the department's website. The
information packet must be reviewed not later than February 1 and
updated as necessary. The department may partner with external
advocacy groups and actual families of prisoners in the packet-
writing process to ensure that the information is useful and
complete. The packet must provide information on topics including,
but not limited to, all of the following:
(a) How to put money into prisoner accounts.
(b) How to make telephone calls or create Jpay email accounts.
(c) How to visit in person.
(d) Proper procedures for filing complaints or grievances.
(e) The rights of prisoners to physical and mental health
care.
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


(f) The purpose and importance of prisoners signing a medical
release of information form.
(g) How to utilize the offender tracking information system
(OTIS).
(h) Truth in sentencing and how it applies to minimum
sentences.
(i) The parole process.
(j) Guidance on the importance of the role of families in the
reentry process.
Sec. 718. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department must pursue all opportunities to reduce costs for
prisoners and prisoners' families for financial deposit fees and
commissary fees when the department negotiates or renews any
contract to provide these services.
Sec. 719. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for contraband
prevention must be used by the department to enhance a multifaceted
approach to contraband prevention that combines technology,
rigorous policies, vigilant staff, intelligence gathering, and a
commitment to addressing the root causes of contraband, all of
which are necessary for preventing contraband introductions and
maintaining safe and secure correctional facilities.
(2) Funds appropriated in part 1 for contraband prevention
must be used by the department to support the prevention of
contraband in correctional facilities, including increasing the
frequency and enhancing the methods of screening all individuals,
including all department employees, and all items entering into
correctional facilities.
(3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for contraband
prevention, the department must submit a report not later than
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


March 1 on contraband and prevention efforts in correctional
facilities. The report must include, but not be limited to, all of
the following:
(a) Prevention efforts and strategies utilized by the
department.
(b) Challenges faced by correctional staff and other staff in
addressing contraband.
(c) Ideas and recommendations on how the legislature can
better assist the department with contraband prevention efforts and
strategies.
Sec. 720. The department shall ensure that Policy Directive
04.01.110 "Access to Correctional Facilities" does not require
active legislative members in good standing to provide prior notice
before being granted access to a department facility when
conducting official legislative business.
Sec. 721. It is the intent of the legislature that the
department reform the strip search protocol so that it results in
fewer and less intrusive strip searches of prisoners to maintain
the safety and security of correctional facilities. If the
department undertakes any efforts to perform fewer and less
intrusive strip searches under this section, it must provide a
report by April 1 on the efforts undertaken.
Sec. 723. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department must allow a prisoner at least 1 in-person visit per 6-
month period, regardless of the prisoner's violation status,
including a prisoner who is on restricted visitation due to
substance use. A prisoner is excluded from the 1 in-person visit
requirement if the prisoner is on restricted visitation for
violence against other prisoners or violence against any department
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


staff. In addition, the department must do all of the following
regarding the visits required under this section:
(a) Prioritize providing staggered time frames for visitors to
sign up for open visiting slots.
(b) Review department protocol for restricting prisoner
visitation, including, but not limited to, Policy Directive 05-03-
140, with the intent of reforming the protocol so that fewer
prisoners with substance use misconducts have their visits
restricted.
(c) Ensure visitation areas are child-friendly by providing
toys, puzzles, and other child-friendly games and activities.
(d) Prioritize providing healthy food choices in vending
machines located in visitation areas of correctional facilities,
including fruits, vegetables, and food items made with whole
ingredients.
(e) Provide a report, by April 1, detailing the efforts taken
to meet the requirements of subdivisions (a) to (d) and the
outcomes of these changes and effects on visitation privileges for
prisoners.
Sec. 724. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department must provide a report by April 1 for the Women's Huron
Valley Correctional Complex that details the meals and medication
administration missed by prisoners at the complex due to lack of
wheelchair access. The report must include all of the following
information:
(a) The total number of meals missed by prisoners due to lack
of wheelchair access.
(b) The total number of prisoners who were not administered
prescribed medication according to their electronic medication
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31


administration record due to a lack of wheelchair access.
Sec. 725. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department must provide a report, by facility, by April 1 on the
prisoner benefit fund. The report must include, for each facility,
all of the following information:
(a) The balance of the fund as of September 30 of the previous
fiscal year.
(b) The total amount deposited into the fund in the previous
fiscal year, categorized by the source of deposit.
(c) The total amount spent from the fund in the previous
fiscal year.
(d) The general categories of the expenditure of the funds and
the amounts spent by category.
Sec. 726. It is the intent of the legislature that if a
correctional facility has created a plan to transition corrections
officer shifts from an 8-hour schedule to a 12-hour schedule, and
the administration of the correctional facility and corrections
officers are in agreement, the department must implement the 12-
hour schedule for that correctional facility.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for 1-time
appropriations for correctional facilities of $55,000,000.00, the
department must pay each facility on a pro rata basis by the
applicable percentage amount of the 1-time reduction made in part 1
for each correctional facility.
Final Page
ELF S06104'26 (S-1) 7x9i31